Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 39 Controversies in School Matters
[See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]

16-39-1.
Appeal of matters of dispute to commissioner.

Parties having any matter of dispute between them arising under any law relating to schools or education may appeal to the commissioner of elementary and secondary education who, after notice to the parties interested of the time and place of hearing, shall examine and decide the appeal without cost to the parties involved.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 62, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 70, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 73, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 199, § 1; P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

16-39-1

.

16-39-2.
Appeal of school committee actions to commissioner.

Any person aggrieved by any decision or doings of any school committee or in any other matter arising under any law relating to schools or education may appeal to the commissioner of elementary and secondary education who, after notice to the parties interested of the time and place of hearing, shall examine and decide the appeal without cost to the parties involved.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 62, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 70, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 73, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 199, § 2; P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

16-39-2

.

16-39-3.
Appeal to state board of regents.

Any decision of the commissioner in these matters shall be subject to an appeal to and review by the board of regents for elementary and secondary education.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 199, § 3; P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

16-39-3

.

16-39-3.1.
Enforcement of final decisions.

All final decisions made after a hearing by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education or the board of regents for elementary and secondary education, and which are not subject to further judicial or administrative review, shall be enforceable by mandamus or any other suitable civil action in the superior court for Providence County at the request of any interested party. All these decisions of the commissioner and board shall become final if judicial or further administrative review is not properly sought within thirty (30) days of their issuance.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 135, § 1.

16-39-3.2.
Interim protective orders.

In all cases concerning children, other than cases arising solely under §

16-2-17

, the commissioner of elementary and secondary education shall also have power to issue any interim orders pending a hearing as may be needed to ensure that a child receives education in accordance with applicable state and federal laws and regulations during the pendency of the matter. Hearings on these interim orders shall be conducted within five (5) working days of a request for relief and the decision shall be issued within five (5) working days of the completion of the hearing. These interim orders shall be enforceable in the superior court at the request of any interested party.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 61, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 425, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 236, § 1.

16-39-4.
Judicial review.

Judicial review may be obtained by any aggrieved party as provided in chapter 35 of title 42.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 43.

16-39-5.
Legal remedies preserved.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed as to deprive any aggrieved party of any legal remedy.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 199, § 5; P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

16-39-5

.

16-39-6.
Rules for appeals.

The board of regents for elementary and secondary education may prescribe rules regulating the time and manner of taking appeals, and rules to prevent appeals for trifling and frivolous causes.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 62, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 70, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 73, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 199, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 199, § 6; P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

16-39-6

.

16-39-7.
Costs in matters appealable under chapter.

In any civil suit before any court against any school officer for any matter which might by this chapter have been heard and decided by the board of regents for elementary and secondary education, no costs shall be taxed for the plaintiff if the court is of the opinion that the officer acted in good faith.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 62, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 70, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 73, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 199, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 199, § 7; P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

16-39-7

.

16-39-8.
Subpoena power of the department of elementary and secondary education.

In any hearing conducted within the department of elementary and secondary education, the commissioner of elementary and secondary education or the hearing officer shall have the power to issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of documents or other material. Subpoenas shall also be issued by the commissioner or hearing officer at the request of any party participating in any hearing. If not complied with, subpoenas issued under this section shall be enforceable in a contempt action brought in the superior court of Providence County by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education or any party in interest.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 147, § 1.